West Virginia, session 2026, SB1024.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 5. county boards of education. §18-5-22f. Authority of county board to reverse school closure decision prior to July 15. (a) Legislative findings.The Legislature finds that:(1) School closure decisions have substantial impacts on students, families, employees, and communities;(2) County boards of education should retain flexibility to reconsider closure decisions when new financial, enrollment, facility, or community information becomes available; and(3) Establishing a uniform deadline promotes transparency and certainty prior to the start of each school year.(b) Reversal authority.Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a county board of education that has voted to permanently close a public school facility for a forthcoming school year may rescind or reverse that decision by majority vote of the board at any time on or before July 15 of the same calendar year.(c) Effect of reversal.Upon reversal of a closure decision:(1) The school shall be considered open and operational for the upcoming school year;(2) The county board shall promptly notify the State Superintendent of Schools and the State Board of Education of the action; and(3) The county board shall take reasonable administrative steps to reinstate staffing, student assignment, transportation, and budgeting necessary to operate the school.(d) Procedure.A reversal under this section shall:(1) Occur at a duly noticed public meeting of the county board; and(2) Be recorded in the official minutes of the board.(e) Limitation.After July 15 of the calendar year in which a closure decision is made, a county board of education may not reopen or reverse a closed school for that same upcoming school year, except as otherwise authorized by law.(f) Construction.Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a county board to reverse a closure decision or to alter existing statutory requirements governing the initial process for school closure.